Utah statutes.
11-13-221.   Compliance with chapter sufficient to effectuate agreements.

When public agencies enter into agreements under this chapter whereby they utilize a power or facility jointly, or whereby one political agency provides a service or facility to another, compliance with the requirements of this chapter is sufficient to effectuate those agreements.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 286, 2002 General Session

